Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Cigarettes and Cigarette Packaging

248.750.
Definitions for KRS 248.750 to 248.769.

As used in KRS

248.750

to

248.769

:

“Cigarettes” has the same meaning as in KRS

138.130

;

“Department” means the Department of Revenue;

“Importer” has the same meaning as in 26

U.S.C. sec. 5702(k)

;

“Manufacturer” means any person who manufactures or produces cigarettes within or without the Commonwealth;

“Master settlement agreement” means the settlement agreement (and related documents) entered into on November 23, 1998, by Kentucky and leading United States tobacco product manufacturers;

“Nonparticipating manufacturer” has the same meaning as in KRS

131.600

;

“Package” has the same meaning as in 15

U.S.C. sec. 1332(4)

; and

“Person” has the same meaning as in KRS

446.010

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2001, ch. 150, § 1, effective January 1, 2002; 2005, ch. 85, § 666, effective June 20, 2005; 2015 ch. 55, § 13, effective July 1, 2015.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/1/2015). Under the authority of KRS 7.136(1), the Reviser of Statutes has changed the internal numbering of this statute to place definitions in alphabetical order. No words were changed in this process.

248.752.
Prohibited acts relating to cigarettes and cigarette packaging.

No person shall:

Sell or distribute, in this Commonwealth; acquire, hold, own, possess, or transport in this Commonwealth; for sale or distribution in this Commonwealth; or import or cause to be imported into this Commonwealth for sale or distribution in this Commonwealth:

Any cigarettes the package of which:

Bears any statement, label, stamp, sticker, or notice indicating that the manufacturer did not intend the cigarettes to be sold, distributed, or used in the United States including, but not limited to, a label stating “For Export Only,” “U.S. Tax Exempt,” “For Use Outside U.S.,” or similar wording; or

Does not comply with:

All requirements imposed by or in accordance with federal law regarding warnings, and other information on packages of cigarettes manufactured, packaged, or imported for sale, distribution, or use in the United States including, but not limited to, the precise warning label specified in the Federal Cigarette Labeling and Advertising Act, 15

U.S.C. sec. 1333

; and

All federal trademark and copyright laws;

Any cigarettes in violation of federal law or federal regulations, including, but not limited to, cigarettes imported into the United States in violation of 26

U.S.C. sec. 5754

, 26

U.S.C. sec. 5704

, 19

U.S.C. secs. 1681

-1681b, U.S. Customs Law including Chapter 4, Subtitle IV of the Federal Tariff Act of 1930, 19

U.S.C. secs. 1671

-1677n, or Pub. L. No. 106-476, the Federal Imported Cigarette Compliance Act of 2000; or

Any cigarettes for which there has not been submitted to the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services the list or lists of the ingredients added to tobacco in the manufacture of the cigarettes required by the Federal Cigarette Labeling and Advertising Act, 15

U.S.C. sec. 1335

a;

Alter the package of any cigarettes, prior to the sale or distribution to the ultimate consumer, so as to remove, conceal, or obscure:

Any statement, label, stamp, sticker, or notice described in subsection (1)(a)2.a. of this section; or

Any health warning that is not specified in or does not conform with the requirements of the Federal Cigarette Labeling and Advertising Act, 15

U.S.C. sec. 1333

; or

Affix any stamp required by KRS

138.146

or make other evidence of tax payment as provided in KRS

138.155

to the package of any cigarettes described in subsection (1) of this section or altered in violation of subsection (2) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2001, ch. 150, § 2, effective January 1, 2002.

248.754.
Required filing of copies of customs certificates.

On or before the fifteenth business day of each month, each:

Person licensed to affix the stamp required by KRS

138.146

or make other evidence of tax payment as provided in KRS

138.155

shall file with the department, for all cigarettes imported into the United States to which the person has affixed the stamp required by KRS

138.146

or made other evidence of tax payment as provided in KRS

138.155

in the preceding month, a copy of the current customs certificates required by 19

U.S.C. sec. 1681

a(c) for the entry of cigarettes into the United States; and

Nonparticipating manufacturer and each of its importers shall file with the Attorney General for all cigarettes imported into the United States, a copy of the current customs certificates required by 19

U.S.C. sec. 1681

a(c) for the entry of cigarettes into the United States.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2001, ch. 150, § 3, effective January 1, 2002; 2015 ch. 55, § 14, effective July 1, 2015.

248.756.
Administrative and civil penalties for violation of KRS 248.752 or 248.754 — Forfeiture of cigarettes.

The department may revoke the license issued in accordance with KRS

138.195

of any licensee and impose a civil penalty of twenty-five dollars ($25) per violation, not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), upon finding a violation by the licensee of KRS

248.752

or

248.754

, as applicable.

Cigarettes that are acquired, held, owned, possessed, transported in, imported into, or sold or distributed in this Commonwealth in violation of KRS

248.752

or

248.754

shall be treated as contraband under KRS

138.165

and be subject to seizure and forfeiture. Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS

138.165

, all cigarettes seized and forfeited shall be destroyed. Cigarettes shall be treated as contraband whether the violation of KRS

248.752

or

248.754

is knowing or otherwise.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2001, ch. 150, § 4, effective January 1, 2002; 2015 ch. 55, § 15, effective July 1, 2015.

248.758.
Presumption of purchase outside of the ordinary business channels of trade of certain imported or reimported cigarettes.

For the purposes of KRS

138.146

and

248.750

to

248.769

, cigarettes imported or reimported into the United States for sale or distribution under any trade name, trade dress, or trademark that is the same as or is confusingly similar to any trade name, trade dress, or trademark used for cigarettes manufactured in the United States for sale or distribution in the United States shall be presumed to have been purchased outside of the ordinary business channels of trade.

History.

Enact. Acts 2001, ch. 150, § 5, effective January 1, 2002.

248.760.
Violation of KRS 248.752 or 248.754 as constituting an unfair trade practice — Applicability of unfair trade practice law.

A violation of the provisions of KRS

248.752

or

248.754

shall constitute an unlawful trade practice as provided in KRS

365.260

to

365.380

and, in addition to any remedies or penalties set forth in KRS

248.756

,

248.762

, and

248.766

, shall be subject to any remedies or penalties available for a violation of the provisions of KRS

365.260

to

365.380

.

Any person who sells, distributes, or manufactures cigarettes shall be bound by Kentucky law on unfair trade practices, KRS

365.020

to

365.050

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2001, ch. 150, § 6, effective January 1, 2002.

248.762.
Criminal penalties for violation of KRS 248.752 or 248.754.

Any person that commits any of the acts prohibited by KRS

248.752

, either knowing or having reason to know he or she is doing so, or that fails to comply with any of the requirements in KRS

248.754

is guilty of a Class D felony and, in addition, may be subject to a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) and costs of prosecution.

History.

Enact. Acts 2001, ch. 150, § 7, effective January 1, 2002.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Designation of offenses; penalties, see KRS

532.020

.

Sentence of imprisonment for felony, see KRS

532.060

.

248.764.
Enforcement of KRS 248.752 and 248.754.

KRS

248.752

and

248.754

shall be enforced by the Attorney General, but at the request of the Attorney General or the Attorney General’s duly authorized agent, the Department of Kentucky State Police and all local police authorities shall enforce KRS

248.752

and

248.754

. The Attorney General has concurrent powers with prosecuting attorneys of the Commonwealth to enforce KRS 248.754 or

248.756

.

For the purpose of enforcing KRS

248.754

and

248.756

, the Attorney General and any agency that the Attorney General shall have delegated enforcement responsibility under subsection (1) of this section may request information from any state or local agency and may share information with and request information from any federal agency and any agency of any other state or any local agency of that state.

History.

Enact. Acts 2001, ch. 150, § 8, effective January 1, 2002; 2007, ch. 85, § 276, effective June 26, 2007.

248.766.
Injunctive relief for violation of KRS 248.752 or 248.754.

Any person who sells, distributes, or manufactures cigarettes and sustains direct economic or commercial injury as a result of a violation of KRS

248.752

or

248.754

may bring an action in good faith for appropriate injunctive relief.

History.

Enact. Acts 2001, ch. 150, § 9, effective January 1, 2002.

248.769.
Cigarettes not subject to KRS 248.752 or 248.754 — Cumulativeness of penalties.

The provisions of KRS

248.752

and

248.754

shall not apply to:

Cigarettes allowed to be imported or brought into the United States for personal use; and

Cigarettes sold or intended to be sold as duty-free merchandise by a duty-free sales enterprise in accordance with the provisions of 19

U.S.C. sec. 1555(b)

and any implementing regulations, but the provisions of KRS

248.754

and

248.756

shall apply to any cigarettes that are brought back into the customs territory for resale within the customs territory.

The penalties provided in KRS

248.756

,

248.760

, and

248.762

are in addition to any other penalties imposed under other law.

History.

Enact. Acts 2001, ch. 150, § 10, effective January 1, 2002.